Rhode Island, session 2025, SB650.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 46-12 of the General Laws entitled "Water Pollution" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
46-12-42. Testing of biosolids.
(a) Any applicant seeking an order of approval from the department of environmental
management for the distribution or land application of biosolids shall test its biosolids for PFAS
contaminants, as that term is defined by § 46-32-2, and the results shall be submitted to the
department with the application for the order of approval.
(b) Any operators with an existing order of approval for the distribution or land application
of biosolids shall test its biosolids quarterly for PFAS contaminants, as that term is defined by §
46-32-2, and submit the results to the department by the last day of each calendar quarter. Sampling
shall commence during the October 2025 to December 2025 quarter, with the first round of results
submitted to the department no later than December 31, 2025.
(c) The director is authorized to reject any application for an order of approval on the basis
that approval of said application would pose an environmental threat or pose a risk to public health,
safety, or welfare.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on September 1, 2025.
========
LC001559/SUB A
========